Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.310

Administration of alternative state educational loans.

The authority, in addition to administering federal loan programs, may administer an alternative state educational loan program that may include the purchase or origination of alternative state educational loans with terms as determined by the authority. These loans are not guaranteed by the state and the proceeds from loan repayment including interest or other loan-related payments or authority or contractor revenue may be used by the authority to make any required payments to bondholders.

[ 2007 c 36 s 4.]

NOTES:

Policy—Purpose—2007 c 36: See note following RCW 28B.07.300.